apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON LASJOBL
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8 K ;
 +SgGenCmp:X4 R ;
 +SgGenCmp:X8 R ;
! +Sg+Gen:X4 PxV ; !^P^
! +Sg+Gen:X8 PxV ; !^P^
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:X4 Px3V ;
! +Sg+Acc:X4 PxV ; !^P^
! +Sg+Acc:X8 PxV ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j K ;
! +Sg+Ill:s%> PxC ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:X2s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:X8st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +PlGenCmp+Use/Sub:X5jd R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:X5jdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Use/Sub:X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;

LEXICON HEAPMIOBL
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8 K ;
 +SgGenCmp:X4 R ;
 +SgGenCmp:X8 R ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X4 PxV ; !^P^
! +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X8 PxV ; !^P^
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X4 Px3V ;
! +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X4 PxV ; !^P^
! +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X8 PxV ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j K ;
! +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:s%> PxC ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:X2s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X8st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +PlGenCmp+Use/Sub:X5jd R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:X5jdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Use/Sub:X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;

!LEXICON AGADJECT !Denominal Adj's with Deriv. -ag/og
! agat:agag BEAKKAN "aged A" ;


! Adverbs from adjectives

LEXICON ADVV
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:Q7t K ;

LEXICON ADVC
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:it K ;




! Adjectives from nouns

LEXICON AGAdj
 +A+Attr:%> K ;
! +A: VUOHTA ; pointer to VUOHTA in GAPPUS0
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +A:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%> PxC ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:%> R ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%> K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:%>iiddá%> Px1V ;






! -------------------
! Possessive suffixes
! -------------------

LEXICON PxV
 :X2 Px1V ;
 :X2 Px2V ;
 :X1 Px3V ;

LEXICON PxV2
 : Px1V ;
 : Px2V ;
 : Px3V ;

LEXICON Px1V
 +PxSg1:n K ;
 +PxSg1+Use/Sub:m9 K ; ! !SOUTH
 +PxDu1:me K ;
 +PxPl1:met K ;


LEXICON Px1C
 +PxSg1:an K ;
 +PxSg1+Use/Sub:am9 K ; ! !SOUTH
 +PxDu1:eame K ;
 +PxPl1:eamet K ;

LEXICON Px2V
 +PxSg2:t K ;
 +PxDu2:de K ;
 +PxPl2:det K ;

LEXICON Px3V
 +PxSg3:s K ;
 +PxDu3:ska K ;
 +PxPl3:set K ;


!LEXICON PxSgV !Sg only
! +PxSg1:n K;
! +PxSg1:m9 K; !SUB !SOUTH
! +PxSg2:t K;
! +PxSg3:s K;

LEXICON PxA
! symposiaskka
 +PxSg1:n K ;
 +PxSg1+Use/Sub:m9 K ; ! !SOUTH
 +PxSg2:t K ;
 +PxSg3:s K ;
 +PxDu1:me K ;
 +PxDu2:tte K ;
 +PxDu3:skka K ;
 +PxPl1:met K ;
 +PxPl2:ttet K ;
 +PxPl3:set K ;

LEXICON PxC
 +PxSg1:an K ;
 +PxSg1+Use/Sub:am9 K ; ! !SOUTH
 +PxSg2:at K ;
 +PxSg3:is K ;
 +PxDu1:eame K ;
 +PxDu2:eatte K ;
 +PxDu3:easkka K ;
 +PxPl1:eamet K ;
 +PxPl2:eattet K ;
 +PxPl3:easet K ;

LEXICON PxPlComC
 +PxSg1:angujn K ;
 +PxSg2:atgujn K ;
 +PxSg3:isgujn K ;
 +PxDu1:eamegujn K ;
 +PxDu2:eattegujn K ;
 +PxDu3:easkkagujn K ;
 +PxPl1:eametgujn K ;
 +PxPl2:eattetgujn K ;
 +PxPl3:easetgujn K ;

LEXICON PxPlComV1
 :X2 PxPlCom12V ;
 :X1 PxPlCom3V ;

LEXICON PxPlCom12V
 +PxSg1:ngujn K ;
 +PxSg2:tgujn K ;
 +PxDu1:megujn K ;
 +PxDu2:degujn K ;
 +PxPl1:metgujn K ;
 +PxPl2:detgujn K ;

LEXICON PxPlCom3V
 +PxSg3:sgujn K ;
 +PxDu3:skagujn K ;
 +PxPl3:setgujn K ;













! ================
! Verb conjugation
! ================



! ---------------------------------
! Basic lexica for bisyllabic verbs
! ---------------------------------


! Modals
! ------

! These are treated separately because
!  modals do not participate in derivation

LEXICON GALGA_IV
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%> PrsV ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%> PrtV ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs:%>Q7ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Cond:%> CondV1 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+IV:%>X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N:»mušš@C.NeedNoun@ MUSH ;



LEXICON FERTE_IV
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +V+IV+Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Ind:%>j CSufDOHPPE ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>Y6 PrtV1 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV4 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N:»mušš@C.NeedNoun@ MUSH ;


! Ordinary bisyllabic verbs
! -------------------------


LEXICON ARVI_IV !Bisyllabic Impersonal Verbs!
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsARVI ;
 :%> ARVICnj ;

LEXICON ARVALADDA_IV !Already derived words (except words ending -uššat)
 :%> ARVICnj ;


LEXICON DIEHTI_TV      !Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;

LEXICON BORRA_TV      !Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 

LEXICON Verb
arvit:ar'vi ARVI_IV ;
atnit:atni DIEHTI_TV ;
baikit:bajki DIEHTI_TV ;
bajás#doallat:bajás#doalla BORRA_TV ;
baldit:bal'di DIEHTI_TV ;
bardit:bar'di DIEHTI_TV ;
bassat:bassa BORRA_TV ;
batnit:batni DIEHTI_TV ;
beahttit:beahtti DIEHTI_TV ;
bealkit:beal'ki DIEHTI_TV ;
bearrái#geahččat:bearrái#geahčča BORRA_TV ;
beastit:beas'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
biebmat:biebma BORRA_TV ;
bieggaladdat:bieggaladda ARVALADDA_IV ;
bieggat:biegga ARVI_IV ;
bivdit:biv'di DIEHTI_TV ;
biđđit:biđđi DIEHTI_TV ;
bohkat:boh'ka BORRA_TV ;
bohčit:boh'či DIEHTI_TV ;
boktit:bok'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
bordit:bor'di DIEHTI_TV ;
borrat:borra BORRA_TV ;
bostit:bos'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
botnit:botni DIEHTI_TV ;
buitit:buj'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
buktit:buk'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
buohcat:buoh'ca BORRA_TV ;
burgit:bur'gi DIEHTI_TV ;
báhčit:báh'či DIEHTI_TV ;
báikut:báj'ku BORRA_TV ;
báidnit:bájdni DIEHTI_TV ;
bállet:bálle FERTE_IV ;
caggat:cagga BORRA_TV ;
cealkit:ceal'ki DIEHTI_TV ;
coggat:cogga BORRA_TV ;
cábmit:cábmi DIEHTI_TV ;
dadjat+Use/Sub:dadd'ja BORRA_TV ; !
dahkat:dah'ka BORRA_TV ;
davrat:dav'ra BORRA_TV ;
dearpat:dear'pa BORRA_TV ;
deavdit:deav'di DIEHTI_TV ;
doalvut:doal'vu BORRA_TV ;
doarjut:doar'ju BORRA_TV ;
dodjit:dod'ji DIEHTI_TV ;
dovdat:dov'da BORRA_TV ;
duohpat:duoh'pa BORRA_TV ;
duolbmat:duolbma BORRA_TV ;
duostat:duos'ta BORRA_TV ;
duvdit:duv'di DIEHTI_TV ;
duđđat:duđđa BORRA_TV ;
dáidit:dáj'di GALGA_IV ;
dápmat:dápma BORRA_TV ;
fearrat:fearra BORRA_TV ;
fertet:ferte FERTE_IV ;
fuollat:fuolla BORRA_TV ;
gahčat:gah'ča BORRA_TV ;
galgat:gal'ga GALGA_IV ;
galbmit:galbmi ARVI_IV ;
garvit:gar'vi DIEHTI_TV ;
gazzat:gazza BORRA_TV ;
geahččat:geahčča BORRA_TV ;
geaidit:geaj'di DIEHTI_TV ;
geassit:geassi DIEHTI_TV ;
geassut:geassu ARVI_IV ;
giehtaguššat:giehtagušša BORRA_TV ;
gieldit:giel'di DIEHTI_TV ;
giessat:giessa BORRA_TV ;
giktit:gik'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
goardit:goar'di DIEHTI_TV ;
goarrut:goarru BORRA_TV ;
gohcit:goh'ci DIEHTI_TV ;
gokčat:gok'ča BORRA_TV ;
goldit:gol'di DIEHTI_TV ;
guoddit:guoddi DIEHTI_TV ;
guorrat:guorra BORRA_TV ;
guovlat:guov'la BORRA_TV ;
gáddit:gáddi DIEHTI_TV ;
gággat:gágga BORRA_TV ;
gálgat:gál'ga BORRA_TV ;
gávkat:gáv'ka BORRA_TV ;
haksit:hak'si DIEHTI_TV ;
hoahkat:hoah'ka BORRA_TV ;
hoigat:hoj'ga BORRA_TV ;
hutkat:hut'ka BORRA_TV ;
hállat:hálla BORRA_TV ;
hárdit:hár'di DIEHTI_TV ;
iktit:ik'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
jearrat:jearra BORRA_TV ;
jiellat:jiella ARVI_IV ;
joatkit:joat'ki DIEHTI_TV ;
joavgat:joav'ga ARVI_IV ;
juksat:juk'sa BORRA_TV ;
laktit:lak'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
lohkat:loh'ka BORRA_TV ;
luoikat:luoj'ka BORRA_TV ;
luoitit:luoj'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
láhppit:láhppi DIEHTI_TV ;
lállit:lálli DIEHTI_TV ;
mearrat:mearra BORRA_TV ;
mielddis#buktit:mielddis#buk'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
moardit:moar'di DIEHTI_TV ;
muitit:muj'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
muohttit:muohtti ARVI_IV ;
máistit:májs'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
navdit:nav'di DIEHTI_TV ;
neaktit:neak'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
neavvut:neav'vu BORRA_TV ;
niktit:nik'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
njalpit:njalpi DIEHTI_TV ;
njeaidit:njeaj'di DIEHTI_TV ;
njoallut:njoallu BORRA_TV ;
njuohpat:njuoh'pa BORRA_TV ;
njuovvat:njuovva BORRA_TV ;
njáskat:njás'ka BORRA_TV ;
noaidut:noaj'du BORRA_TV ;
noastit:noas'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
notkat:not'ka BORRA_TV ;
nuollat:nuolla BORRA_TV ;
oaffaruššat:oaffarušša BORRA_TV ;
oaidnit:oajdni DIEHTI_TV ;
ohcat:oh'ca BORRA_TV ;
oidit:oj'di DIEHTI_TV ;
ovdan#buktit:ovdan#buk'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
rahtat:rah'ta BORRA_TV ;
rihpat:rih'pa BORRA_TV ;
ruohkkat:ruohkka BORRA_TV ;
ráigat:ráj'ga BORRA_TV ;
rátkit:rát'ki DIEHTI_TV ;
seastit:seas'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
sihtat:sih'ta BORRA_TV ;
sirdit:sir'di DIEHTI_TV ;
smiehttat:smiehtta BORRA_TV ;
sohpat:soh'pa BORRA_TV ;
suitit:suj'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
suoskat:suos'ka BORRA_TV ;
suvvolastit:suvvolas'ti ARVALADDA_IV ;
suđđit:suđđi DIEHTI_TV ;
vadjat:vad'ja BORRA_TV ;
veaddit:veaddi DIEHTI_TV ;
vuohčut:vuoh'ču BORRA_TV ;
vuohttit:vuohtti DIEHTI_TV ;
vuoigŋat:vuojgŋa DIEHTI_TV ;
vuollái#čállit:vuollái#čálli DIEHTI_TV ;
vuorjat:vuor'ja BORRA_TV ;
vuovdit:vuov'di DIEHTI_TV ;
váldit:vál'di DIEHTI_TV ;
ádjit:ád'ji DIEHTI_TV ;
áimmahuššat:áimmahušša BORRA_TV ;
álddagastit:álddagas'ti ARVALADDA_IV ;
časkit:čas'ki DIEHTI_TV ;
čiekčat:čiek'ča BORRA_TV ;
čoaggit:čoaggi DIEHTI_TV ;
čorbmat:čorbma BORRA_TV ;
čuoldit:čuol'di DIEHTI_TV ;
čuopmat:čuopma BORRA_TV ;
šiehttat:šiehtta BORRA_TV ;
šiitit:šij'ti DIEHTI_TV ;
šlahttit:šlahtti ARVI_IV ;
LEXICON Adjective
dološ:dolož AGAdj ;
erenoamáš+Use/Sub:erenoamaž AGAdj ;
erenoamáš+Use/Sub:earenoamaž AGAdj ;
erenoamáš+v1+Use/NG:erenoamáž AGAdj ;
erenoamáš+v2+Dial/%-GG:erenomáž AGAdj ;
erenoamáš+v3+Dial/%-KJ:earenoamáž AGAdj ;
erenoamáš+v4+Use/NG:earenomáž AGAdj ;
ovddeš:ovddež AGAdj ;
ođđa#mállet:ođđa#málleg AGAdj ;
áige#guovdil+A+Comp+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččabu HEAPMIOBL ;
LEXICON Adposition
alde+Po:alddi%> PxV ;
nalde+Po:nalddi%> PxV ;
bálddas+Po:bálda%>s PxC ;
bálddas+Po:báldda%>st PxC ;
badjelii+Po:badjel%>asa PxV ;
bealde+Po:bealddi%> PxV ;
bealis+Po:beali%>st PxC ;
beallái+Po:beallá%>s PxC ;
birra+Po:bira%> PxV2 ;
dáfus+Po:dáfu%>st PxC ;
duohkin+Po:duohki%>n PxC ;
hárrái+Po:hárrá%>s PxC ;
luhtte+Po:luhti%> PxV ;
lusa+Po:lusa%> PxV2 ;
maŋis+Po:maŋi%>st PxC ;
maŋŋái+Po:maŋŋá%>s PxC ;
mielde+Po:mielddi%> PxV ;
mielde+Po+Use/Sub:mielddá%> PxV2 ; ! !SOUTH
ovdii+Po:ovda%>s PxC ;
ovddas+Po:ovdda%>st PxC ;
sisa+Po:sisa%> PxV2 ;
siste+Po:sistti%> PxV ;
vuolde+Po:vuolddi%> PxV ;
